Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-1208
Tax; deductions permitted.

The person remitting to the Tax Commissioner the tax imposed by section 57-1202 shall deduct, from the amount due any person owning an interest in the uranium or in the proceeds of the uranium at the time of severance, the proportionate amount of such tax before making payment to any such person.

Laws 1983, LB 356, § 20.